Rhode Island statutes. Title 18 Fiduciaries
Chapter 3 Fiduciaries’ Emergency Act

18-3-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Fiduciaries’ Emergency Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1140, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

18-3-1

.

18-3-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Cofiduciary” means a trustee or personal representative empowered to exercise fiduciary functions jointly with any person authorized to delegate functions under the provisions of §

18-3-3

;

“Fiduciary” means any trustee or personal representative;

“Functions” includes discretions, powers, and duties;

“Person” includes corporations as well as natural persons;

“Personal representative” means an executor under a will, an administrator cum testamento annexo, an administrator de bonis non, an administrator of an intestate estate, or a guardian of the estate of any person;

“Power of attorney” and “power” means a power of attorney given pursuant to §

18-3-5

;

“Trustee” means any person who is designated in any written instrument, or court order, or in any will admitted to probate in this state to hold property upon trust, whether or not that person has assumed possession of the trust estate or entered upon his or her fiduciary duties;

“War or national emergency” means any period during which the United States is engaged in any war, declared or undeclared, plus a period of sixty (60) days thereafter; and

“War service” means:

Active service during the period of any war or national emergency, whether within or outside of the territory of the United States of America, in any of the naval, military, or air forces of the United States;

Any active service during the period of any war or national emergency on any ship of United States registry; or

Any other work or employment during the period of any war or national emergency outside the continental United States and under the direction of the government of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1140, § 4; P.L. 1950 (s.s.), ch. 2645, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

18-3-2

.

18-3-3.
Delegation of powers by fiduciary.

A trustee or personal representative may delegate, subject to the provisions of §§

18-3-4

—

18-3-7

, to any person or to two (2) or more persons jointly the exercise of any or all functions vested in him or her as the fiduciary, during the whole or any part of:

Any period during which the fiduciary is engaged in war service; or

Any period during which the fiduciary is outside of the continental United States and, for any reason connected with or resulting from any war or national emergency, it is not reasonably practicable for him or her to return to the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1140, § 1; P.L. 1950 (s.s.), ch. 2645, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-3-3

.

18-3-4.
Implied or constructive trust.

Nothing in §

18-3-3

shall authorize the delegation of the exercise of any functions in relation to an implied or constructive trust.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1140, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-3-4

.

18-3-5.
Power of attorney — Recording.

Any functions delegated pursuant to the authority of §

18-3-3

shall be delegated by written power of attorney, signed before at least one witness, and the power of attorney may be acknowledged and recorded where the instrument or order under which the fiduciary was appointed is recorded, or, if the instrument or order has not been recorded in any town or city in this state, in the office of the recorder of deeds of the town or city in which any property included in the assets of the estate is situated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1140, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-3-5

.

18-3-6.
Power additional.

The power of delegation conferred by §

18-3-3

shall be in addition to and not in derogation of any other power of delegation, whether conferred by statute or otherwise.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1140, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-3-6

.

18-3-7.
Judicial approval of delegation.

No delegation of any functions pursuant to the authority of §

18-3-3

shall become effective until the delegation has been authorized or approved, if the delegation is by a trustee, by the superior court of this state for the county within which the power of attorney may be recorded, or if the delegation is by a personal representative, by the probate court of the city or town in which the power of attorney may be recorded.

The superior court and the several probate courts are authorized and empowered to approve or disapprove any delegation in their discretion, upon petition of the donor or donee thereof ex parte and without notice, or upon any reasonable notice that the court shall direct.

A copy of any order granting the approval, certified by the clerk of the court granting the approval, shall be conclusive evidence in favor of a person dealing with the donee of the power of attorney that the power of attorney was validly given pursuant to this section and was operative and effective as of the date of the order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1140, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-3-7

.

18-3-8.
Time of execution of power of attorney.

A power of attorney executed under the authority of §

18-3-3

may be made either before or after the commencement of the period to which the power relates, to become operative after the beginning of the period.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1140, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

18-3-8

.

18-3-9.
Acts performed before notice of revocation of power.

Notwithstanding the revocation of any power of attorney, whether by act of the donor of the power or by operation of law, any act done or instrument executed by the donee of the power shall be as valid and effectual in favor of any person dealing with the donee as if the power of attorney had remained unrevoked at the time when the act was done or the instrument was executed, unless the person dealing with the act or instrument had at that time actual notice of the revocation of the power of attorney.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1140, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

18-3-9

.

18-3-10.
Notice that donor of power is missing.

No person shall be deemed, for the purposes of this chapter, to have actual notice of the death of any donor of a power of attorney only by reason of a report to the effect that the donor is missing, or is missing and is believed to have been killed, unless the death of the donor has been presumed by order of a court of competent jurisdiction and the person in question has notice of the order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1140, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

18-3-10

.

18-3-11.
Appointment in good faith.

In any proceedings brought against the donor of a power of attorney in respect of any act or default of the donee of the power, it shall be a sufficient defense for the donor to prove that the donee was appointed by the donor in good faith and without negligence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1140, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

18-3-11

.

18-3-12.
Judicial supervision of donee.

All jurisdiction and powers of any court shall apply to the donee of the power of attorney in the same manner and to the same extent with respect to the exercise of the functions and the administration of the trust or estate to which the power of attorney relates, as if the donee was acting in relation to the trust or estate in the same capacity as the donor of the power of attorney.

The court at any time, or from time to time, may make any orders with respect to the bonds of the donor and donee of any power of attorney, or either of them, and as to the surety on the bonds, if any, that the court deems proper, with or without notice, in its discretion.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1140, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

18-3-12

.

18-3-13.
Delegation of powers by donee.

The donee of a power of attorney, except as restricted by the terms thereof, may himself or herself exercise all the powers of delegation as the donor of the power of attorney might personally exercise.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1140, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

18-3-13

.

18-3-14.
Exercise of powers by cofiduciaries.

If any trustee or personal representative fails to delegate the exercise of any functions vested in him or her as a fiduciary, as permitted by §§

18-3-3

—

18-3-7

, or if, having made a delegation for a limited period, the period has expired, and if the trustee or personal representative is engaged in war service or is outside the continental United States, and for any reason connected with or resulting from any war or national emergency it is not reasonably practicable for him or her to return to the United States, the cofiduciary or cofiduciaries of the trustee or personal representative, if there is any, shall have and may exercise, as long and only as long as the conditions specified in the preceding provisions of this section exist, all of the functions and shall be subject to all of the responsibilities that would devolve upon the cofiduciary or cofiduciaries if the trustee or personal representative were dead, except, the duty to make an accounting of the estate as if the trustee or personal representative had died. Thereafter, until these conditions cease to exist, the trustee or personal representative shall no longer have or possess any of the functions or responsibilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1140, § 3; P.L. 1950 (s.s.), ch. 2645, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

18-3-14

.

18-3-15.
Conclusive effect of statement under oath by cofiduciaries.

A statement under oath by the cofiduciary or cofiduciaries, upon information and belief, as to the existence of any of the conditions specified in §

18-3-14

, shall be conclusive evidence of that fact in favor of any person dealing with the cofiduciary or cofiduciaries.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1140, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

18-3-15

.

18-3-16.
Chapter controlling.

The provisions of this chapter shall be controlling, notwithstanding any rule of law or equity or any provisions of any other statute of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1140, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

18-3-16

.